th: รูปแบบเบาะรองรับ: 2 โมดูล; 3 โมดูล; 4 โมดูล; 5 โมดูล; 6 โมดูล; 7 โมดูล; 8 โมดูล; 9 โมดูล; ชิ้นเดียว; อื่นๆ
fr: Configuration des stands: 2 modules; 3 modules; 4 modules; 5 modules; 6 modules; 7 modules; 8 modules; 9 modules; Une pièce; Autre
bg-BG: Конфигурация на ямата: 2 модула; 3 модула; 4 модула; 5 модула; 6 модула; 7 модула; 8 модула; 9 модула; От една част; Друго
ru: Конфигурация ямы: 2 модуля; 3 модуля; 4 модуля; 5 модулей; 6 модулей; 7 модулей; 8 модулей; 9 модулей; Цельная; Другое
lt-LT: Čiužinių išdėstymas: 2 moduliai; 3 moduliai; 4 moduliai; 5 moduliai; 6 moduliai; 7 moduliai; 8 moduliai; 9 moduliai; Vientisas; Kita
el: Διαμόρφωση pit: 2 μονάδες; 3 μονάδες; 4 μονάδες; 5 μονάδες; 6 μονάδες; 7 μονάδες; 8 μονάδες; 9 μονάδες; Ενός τεμαχίου; Άλλο
nb: Konfigurasjon for grop: 2 moduler; 3 moduler; 4 moduler; 5 moduler; 6 moduler; 7 moduler; 8 moduler; 9 moduler; Ett stykke; Annet
zh-TW: 坑位配置: 2 個模組; 3 個模組; 4 個模組; 5 個模組; 6 個模組; 7 個模組; 8 個模組; 9 個模組; 一件式; 其他
it: Configurazione del pit: 2 moduli; 3 moduli; 4 moduli; 5 moduli; 6 moduli; 7 moduli; 8 moduli; 9 moduli; Pezzo unico; Altro
nl: Pitconfiguratie: 2 modules; 3 modules; 4 modules; 5 modules; 6 modules; 7 modules; 8 modules; 9 modules; Eéndelig; Overig
ro-RO: Configurația gropii: 2 module; 3 module; 4 module; 5 module; 6 module; 7 module; 8 module; 9 module; O singură bucată; Altele
pt-PT: Configuração do fosso: 2 módulos; 3 módulos; 4 módulos; 5 módulos; 6 módulos; 7 módulos; 8 módulos; 9 módulos; Uma peça; Outra
hr-HR: Konfiguracija jame: 2 modula; 3 modula; 4 modula; 5 modula; 6 modula; 7 modula; 8 modula; 9 modula; Jednodijelna; Ostalo
en: Pit configuration: 2 modules; 3 modules; 4 modules; 5 modules; 6 modules; 7 modules; 8 modules; 9 modules; One piece; Other
sl-SI: Konfiguracija jame: 2 modula; 3 moduli; 4 moduli; 5 modulov; 6 modulov; 7 modulov; 8 modulov; 9 modulov; Enodelno; Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia jamky: 2 moduly; 3 moduly; 4 moduly; 5 modulov; 6 modulov; 7 modulov; 8 modulov; 9 modulov; Jeden kus; Iné
pl: Konfiguracja zeskoku: 2 moduły; 3 moduły; 4 moduły; 5 moduły; 6 modułów; 7 modułów; 8 modułów; 9 modułów; Jednoczęściowa; Inna
da: Konfiguration af pit: 2 moduler; 3 moduler; 4 moduler; 5 moduler; 6 moduler; 7 moduler; 8 moduler; 9 moduler; Ét stykke; Andet
fi: Kuopan konfiguraatio: 2 moduulia; 3 moduulia; 4 moduulia; 5 moduulia; 6 moduulia; 7 moduulia; 8 moduulia; 9 moduulia; Yksiosainen; Muu
hu: Labdamedence konfigurációja: 2 modul; 3 modul; 4 modul; 5 modul; 6 modul; 7 modul; 8 modul; 9 modul; Egyrészes; Egyéb
de: Mattenkonfiguration: 2 Module; 3 Module; 4 Module; 5 Module; 6 Module; 7 Module; 8 Module; 9 Module; Einteilig; Andere
cs: Uspořádání boxů: 2 moduly; 3 moduly; 4 moduly; 5 moduly; 6 modulů; 7 modulů; 8 modulů; 9 modulů; Jeden kus; Ostatní
tr: Çukur konfigürasyonu: 2 modül; 3 modül; 4 modül; 5 modül; 6 modül; 7 modül; 8 modül; 9 modül; Tek parça; Diğer
ja: ピット構造: 2モジュール; 3モジュール; 4モジュール; 5モジュール; 6モジュール; 7モジュール; 8モジュール; 9モジュール; 1ピース; その他
pt-BR: Colchão, configuração: 2 módulos; 3 módulos; 4 módulos; 5 módulos; 6 módulos; 7 módulos; 8 módulos; 9 módulos; Peça única; Outros
vi: Cấu hình hố nhảy: 2 mô-đun; 3 mô-đun; 4 mô-đun; 5 mô-đun; 6 mô-đun; 7 mô-đun; 8 mô-đun; 9 mô-đun; Nguyên khối; Khác
ko: 피트 구성: 2모듈; 3모듈; 4모듈; 5모듈; 6모듈; 7모듈; 8모듈; 9모듈; 1피스; 기타
es: Configuración del foso: 2 módulos; 3 módulos; 4 módulos; 5 módulos; 6 módulos; 7 módulos; 8 módulos; 9 módulos; Una pieza; Otra
zh-CN: 跳高垫配置: 2 个模块; 3 个模块; 4 个模块; 5 个模块; 6 个模块; 7 个模块; 8 个模块; 9 个模块; 单块; 其他
sv: Utformning av grop/pit: 2 moduler; 3 moduler; 4 moduler; 5 moduler; 6 moduler; 7 moduler; 8 moduler; 9 moduler; En del; Övrigt